Washington statutes.
RCW 2.08.210

Extent of court's process—Venue.

The process of the superior courts shall extend to all parts of the state: PROVIDED, That all actions for the recovery of the possession of, quieting the title to, or for the enforcement of liens upon, real estate, shall be commenced in the county in which the real estate, or any part thereof, affected by such action or actions is situated.

[ 1890 p 343 s 9; RRS s 32.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. CR 4(f).

Extent of process: State Constitution Art. 4 s 6 (Amendment 28).

Venue: Chapter 4.12 RCW.